Utah statutes.
57-19-19.   Subpoenas -- Evidence.

(1)  For the purposes of any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the director, or any officer designated by him, may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the director considers relevant or material to the inquiry.

(2)  A person who disobeys any subpoena lawfully issued by the director, or who refuses to testify to any matters regarding which he may be lawfully interrogated, is subject to the provisions of Section 78B-6-313.

